New Jersey, session 222, S853.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority. Center means the New Jersey Business Action Center created in the Department of State. Manufacturing business attraction, expansion, and retention marketing plan or marketing plan means a strategic and comprehensive plan that establishes short-range and long-range goals, policies, and needs of State government in efficiently allocating its finite resources towards projects that attract new manufacturing businesses and retain and expand existing manufacturing businesses. Secretary means the Secretary of State. Southern New Jersey means the counties of Atlantic, Cape May, Cumberland, and Salem. 2.    a. Within one year after the date of enactment of P.L.    ,        c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the Secretary of State shall develop and implement a manufacturing business attraction, expansion, and retention marketing plan for areas located in southern New Jersey.  The secretary shall update the marketing plan once every five years thereafter. b.    The purpose of the marketing plan shall be to develop strategies, policies, short-range and long-range goals, and government reforms that are designed to help attract new manufacturing businesses to, and retain and expand existing manufacturing businesses in, areas located in southern New Jersey and encourage the growth of jobs and capital investment within, and manufacturing business services to, areas located in southern New Jersey. 3.    The secretary is authorized to request assistance from the center and the authority and any other department, authority, commission, board, office, division, or agency of the State to provide any information, resources, or other assistance deemed necessary to discharge the secretarys responsibilities under P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to develop and implement the marketing plan.  This may include, but not be limited to, requesting assistance from: the authority and the Department of the Treasury for advice and information concerning manufacturing business funding assistance programs; the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for assistance in developing workforce development strategies; the Department of Transportation and the New Jersey Transit Corporation for information and guidance concerning public transportation network and infrastructure projects that would most effectively connect population centers with employers within southern New Jersey; the center to assist in manufacturing business attraction, expansion, and retention strategies and advising on smart growth development strategies; and the Department of Community Affairs for assistance with coordination between the urban enterprise zone program established by P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 et al.) and the marketing plan. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.